South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3311.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Article 15, Chapter 13, Title 7 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 7-13-1625. (A) Any voting system purchased by the State of South Carolina or any state agency, board, commission, or council must meet the following requirements: (1) a voter must be able to mark by hand a paper ballot; and (2) all paper ballots must be counted by hand, and no tabulating equipment may be used. (B) Nothing in this section may be construed as precluding the purchase of a voting system with features or components necessary to ensure compliance with other federal and state law requirements including, without limitation, at least one accessible voting system per polling place equipped for individuals with disabilities in accordance with 52 U.S.C. Section 21081 of the "Help America Vote Act of 2002." SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----